District of Columbia statutes.
47-4665.04

The Advisory Board Company — community benefits.

Within 30 days of [February 26, 2016], the Company shall enter into a community benefits agreement with the Mayor that shall include requirements for training, employment, and youth development and free services to underserved communities in the District.

Feb. 26, 2016, D.C. Law 21-71, § 2(b), 63 DCR 1